HunSpellDictionaries/uk_UA.dic
арканити/ABGH
бастувати/AG
батькувати/ABGH
блудити/AEG
бринькати/IG
бронзовіти/IG
брякнути/ABEF
булькотати/AG
важити/ABCDGH
вгинати/IJGH
вгледіти/ABCD
вдавлювати/ABGH
вдовбувати/AB
вершити/ABEFGH
взувати/IJGH
вивозити/ABCDGH
виволікати/IJGH
вигаптовувати/AB
видавати/ABGH
видалити/ABEF
видати/KL
визначити/ABCD
виїжджати/IG
вилазити/ACG
виливати/IJGH
виліпити/ABEF
вилощувати/AB
вимерзнути/KE
вимітати/IJ
вимолоти/KL
виплеснути/ABEF
виповнювати/ABGHOP
випродати/K
випхнути/AE
вирішати/IJ
висиджувати/AGBH
висипати/ABIJGH
вискочити/AC
висохнути/KE
вистрибнути/AE
вити/IJ
витончити/AB
виходити/ACG
вишкірити/AB
вишукувати/ABGH
вияснити/AE
відбити/KL
відбороняти/I
віддати/KL
віддзеркалити/ABCD
відігнати/KL
відіпрати/KL
відкреслити/AE
відлипати/IG
відмерзнути/KE
відмикати/IJ
відморозити/AC
відокремити/ABCD
відпочити/K
відрізнити/ABEF
відсісти/K
відставити/AC
відстрибати/I
відсувати/IJGH
відходити/ACG
відчепити/ABEF
вказати/A
вклоняти/IJGH
влізати/I
водрузити/ABEF
воскреснути/KE
вписати/AB
вправити/ABCD
впрівати/IG
всиляти/IJ
втихнути/KE
втолочувати/A
втомити/ABEFX
входити/ACG
вшивати/IJGH
гепати/IJ
гилити/A
глобалізувати/ABGH
глухнути/AE
грабарювати/AG
гудіти/AEG
давити/ABEFGH
деформувати/AB
дзвонити/AEG
дзенькати/I
дістати/KL
доводити/ABGHCD
догвинчувати/A
догладжувати/ABGH
дожинати/I
докінчити/AE
домірковувати/AB
доплутати/I
допускати/IJGH
досмажити/AB
доступити/ABEF
дотлівати/I
друкувати/ABGH
дунути/AC
дурити/A
жати/KL
жбурляти/IJGH
жовтішати/I
забарвлювати/ABGHOP
завернути/ABEF
завивати/IJGH
завіяти/IJ
загаснути/K
загинути/AC
загубити/ABEF
загудіти/AE
задзвякати/I
задіти/K
заквітчати/I
закинути/ABCD
закладати/IJGH
закотити/ABEF
закружити/AB
залучати/IJGH
замовкнути/KE
замучити/ABCD
занюхати/I
запалити/ABEF
заплигнути/A
заподіти/K
запроваджувати/ABGH
запустіти/I
зарум'янити/ABCD
зарядити/ABEF
застарівати/I
застібнути/AB
застопорити/ABEF
застрелити/ABCD
застрягнути/KE
затупити/ABEF
затупцяти/I
затягати/IGJH
зацікавити/ABCD
заштормити/A
збавляти/IJ
збагнути/AE
збліднути/K
звеличити/ABCD
звити/KL
зводити/ABCDGH
згладити/ABCD
здеревіти/I
здохнути/KE
зібрати/KL
злізти/A
змастити/ABEF
змерзнути/KE
змикати/IJ
змінювати/ABGH
змучити/ABCD
зникнути/KE
зринути/AC
зупиняти/IJGH
зчепити/ABEF
зчиняти/IJ
індукувати/AB
кадити/ABGH
канючити/ABCD
ковтнути/AE
колапсувати/AGO
користувати/ABGH
кредитувати/ABGH
крутити/ABEFGH
кульгати/I
латати/IJGH
лащити/ABCDGH
любити/ABEFGH
мазюкати/IJGH
мигати/I
мімікрувати/AG
мозолити/ACG
мокнути/KLEF
молити/ABEFGH
мочити/AEG
мурувати/ABGH
наводити/ABCDGH
навчати/IJGH
наддати/K
надкусити/ABEF
назирати/IG
накоїти/AC
накочувати/AB
намолоти/K
напасати/IJ
наповнити/ABEF
наринути/AC
наряджати/IJGH
настріляти/I
насушити/AB
натворити/AE
натягнути/KLEF
непокоїти/ABCDGH
нести/IJGH
нявкотіти/AG
няньчити/ABEFGH
обвити/KL
обдарувати/AB
обідрати/KL
обкрадати/I
обложити/ABEF
обмовити/ABCD
обсісти/KL
обступати/I
обтрусити/ABEF
обшарити/AC
обшахровувати/A
одіти/KL
оздоровлювати/ABGH
ойкнути/AE
окривіти/I
оплавити/ABCD
осліпити/ABEF
осліпнути/KE
осягати/I
охолоджувати/AB
оцінити/AE
ощасливити/ABCD
пахтіти/K
перебивати/IJGHQR
переводити/ABCDGH
перегнити/I
передоручити/ABEF
перезібрати/KL
перекаламутити/AB
перемістити/ABEF
перемножити/ABCD
переселяти/IJGH
пересісти/K
перескочити/AC
переслати/A
переспіти/I
перехрестити/ABEF
підбити/KL
підігнати/KL
підкинути/AC
підкувати/AB
підсипати/IJGH
підсмажити/ABCD
підторговувати/AG
підточити/ABEF
побавити/ABCD
побалансувати/A
повипасати/I
повиснути/KE
поглибити/ABCD
погрішити/A
подихати/I
подіти/KL
подрібнити/ABEF
поздоровляти/I
позмішувати/AB
познайомити/ABCD
полинути/AC
полоти/ABGH
помолодшати/I
помолоти/K
понаколювати/A
поодягати/IJ
попідмащувати/A
попригинати/IJ
порадити/ABCD
порішити/AE
послабляти/IG
посолити/AE
посунути/ABCD
похолонути/K
почерпнути/AE
почерствіти/I
пошкодити/ABCD
привезти/A
прив'язувати/ABGHOP
придати/K
призначити/AC
примусити/AC
принишкнути/KE
приростати/I
присьорбувати/A
пристроїти/ABCD
притиснути/KLEF
прищулити/ABCD
проглядати/IJGH
продешевити/AE
продукувати/ABGHOP
прокинути/ABCD
пролягати/IG
промокнути/KE
простежити/AC
простувати/AB
проткнути/ABEF
публікувати/ABGH
ржавіти/I
розбазарити/AC
розбити/KL
розбудити/AE
розглянути/ACW
розголошувати/ABGH
розгорнути/ABEF
розігнати/KL
розмітити/ABCD
розмолоти/KL
розплоджувати/AB
розпорпати/I
розпухнути/KE
розрядити/ABEF
розумнішати/IG
розширити/ABCD
серіалізувати/AB
скиснути/KE
склити/ABE
скоряти/IJ
скрашувати/ABGH
сплигнути/AE
сплюнути/AC
спродати/K
стандартувати/ABGH
стиснути/KLEF
стругати/I
стулити/ABEF
схлипнути/AE
схуднути/KE
танути/ACG
тішити/ABCDGH
тріумфувати/ABGHO
труснути/AE
удавати/AB
укидати/I
укинути/ABCD
умовкнути/K
упорснути/AE
упрошувати/ABGHOP
усохнути/AE
утратити/ABCD
ущухнути/KE
хававкати/I
хвалити/ABEFGH
хвилювати/ABGH
циндрити/AG
чухати/IJGH
шпурнути/ABEF
